District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Green Workforce Pilot Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Establishment of Green Workforce Pilot Program.
(a) The Department of Human Services (the “Department”) shall establish, through its
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Employment and Education Program, the Green
Workforce Pilot Program (the “Pilot”), to assist individuals with fulfilling Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (“SNAP”) work requirements and Medicaid community engagement
requirements while gaining meaningful work experience, conserving the environment, and
improving the District’s physical infrastructure.
(b) The Pilot shall provide 250 people at a time with employment paying no less per hour
than the District minimum wage for no less than 32 hours per month and up to 48 hours per month.


The Pilot may employ individuals through a variety of programs and public- and private-sector
employers, including:
(1) Department of Small and Local Business Development Clean Teams;
(2) The DC Sustainable Energy Utility Workforce Development program;
(3) Green Pathways;
(4) Programs that control invasive plants; or
(5) The Green Stormwater Infrastructure Maintenance Program.
(c) The Pilot shall only enroll individuals:
(1) Not in compliance with SNAP able bodied adults without dependents
(ABAWD) work requirements, but otherwise eligible for SNAP; or
(2) Not in compliance with Medicaid community engagement requirements, but
otherwise eligible for Medicaid.
(d) Pilot participants shall begin work on Pilot initiatives no later than April 1, 2028.
(e) Each Pilot participant shall have access to job coaching services, which may be
provided through an existing District program.
(f) For each Pilot participant enrolled under subsection (c)(1) of this section, the
Department shall collect any information associated with Pilot participation that verifies
compliance with SNAP ABAWD work requirements.
(g) For each Pilot participant enrolled under subsection (c)(2) of this section, the
Department shall collect and send to the Department of Health Care Finance any information
associated with Pilot participation necessary to verify compliance with Medicaid community
engagement requirements.
(h) The Department shall collect at least the following metrics to evaluate the Pilot:


(1) The number of Pilot participants placed with each employer;
(2) The number of weeks each individual participated in the Pilot;
(3) The number and percentage of Pilot participants who claimed the District and
federal Earned Income Tax Credits;
(4) The reason for each individual’s exit from the Pilot, including the number and
percentage of individuals exiting to full-time employment;
(5) The employment status of each individual 6 months after completing Pilot
participation; and
(6) Mean and median income six months after completing Pilot participation.
(i) The Department shall publish anonymized and aggregated data gathered under
subsection (h) of this section on its website during the preceding calendar year no later than May
1st of each calendar year.
(j) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, payments an individual receives from the
Pilot shall not be counted as income or assets:
(1) For the purposes of determining eligibility or calculating benefits under the
District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C.
Official Code § 4-201.01 et seq.); or
(2) For the purpose of determining eligibility or calculating benefits for the
following benefit programs:
(A) The D.C. HealthCare Alliance program referenced in section 8(2) of the
Department of Health Care Finance Establishment Act of 2007, effective February 27, 2008 (D.C.
Law 17-109; D.C. Official Code § 7-771.07(2)), or any subsequent program established to provide
public health insurance coverage to residents ineligible for Medicaid;


(B) Educational scholarships the District administers with local funds;
(C) The Home Purchase Assistance Program established by Chapter 25 of
Title 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations and referenced in section 3a of the
Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978, effective July 1, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-139; D.C.
Official Code § 42-2602.01);
(D) Housing subsidy vouchers issued through the Rent Supplement
Program established by section 26a of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999,
effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 6-226);
(E) The Grandparent Caregiver Program established by section 102 of the
Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Act of 2005, effective March 8, 2006 (D.C.
Law 16-69; D.C. Official Code § 4-251.02);
(F) The Close Relative Caregiver Program established by section 102 of the
Close Relative Caregiver Subsidy Pilot Program Establishment Amendment Act of 2019, effective
November 26, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-32; D.C. Official Code § 4-251.22);
(G) Strong Families, Strong Futures; and
(H) Any other District-funded in-kind assistance, cash assistance, housing,
or healthcare benefit.
100 (k) The Director of the Department shall, consistent with the Grant Administration Act of
101 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), have
102 the authority to issue grants to implement the provisions of this section.
103 (l) The Department may prioritize which individuals or groups of individuals identified in
104 subsection (c) to enroll in the Pilot. The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
105 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-


106 501 et seq.), may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section, including rules
107 establishing time limits on Pilot participation.
108 (m) This section shall expire on March 31, 2031.
109 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
110 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
111 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
112 October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
113 Sec. 4. Effective date.
114 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
115 Mayor, action by the Council overriding the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
116 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
117 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).